engadj.lexc
!!!engadj.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +A +COMP +SUPER

LEXICON Root

Adjective ;

LEXICON Ainf

[stem]+A:0 #;
[stem]+A+COMP:^er #;
[stem]+A+SUPER:^est #;

LEXICON Adjective
Alexandrian Ainf;
Annamese Ainf;
Arretine Ainf;
Balinese Ainf;
Bordelaise Ainf;
Canaanitic Ainf;
Chari-Nile Ainf;
Conservative Ainf;
Dadaistic Ainf;
Egyptological Ainf;
Fahrenheit Ainf;
Fulani Ainf;
Gobian Ainf;
Hebrew Ainf;
Hogarthian Ainf;
Indo-European Ainf;
Javanese Ainf;
Khoisan Ainf;
Levantine Ainf;
Mahdist Ainf;
Mauritanian Ainf;
Minorcan Ainf;
Mysian Ainf;
Nicaraguan Ainf;
Ordovician Ainf;
Panhellenistic Ainf;
Petrine Ainf;
Provencal Ainf;
Rhemish Ainf;
Saharan Ainf;
Scottish Ainf;
Sivaistic Ainf;
Sumatran Ainf;
Terpsichorean Ainf;
Transvaalian Ainf;
Ural-Altaic Ainf;
Walach Ainf;
Zendic Ainf;
abnormal Ainf;
absorptive Ainf;
accessible Ainf;
acescent Ainf;
acrimonious Ainf;
addictive Ainf;
adnate Ainf;
advisable Ainf;
affined Ainf;
agglutinative Ainf;
ailing Ainf;
alchemic Ainf;
aliquot Ainf;
allopathic Ainf;
altruistic Ainf;
amentiferous Ainf;
amphiprotic Ainf;
analemmatic Ainf;
anemometrical Ainf;
anisotropic Ainf;
antemeridian Ainf;
antifebrile Ainf;
antistatic Ainf;
apiarian Ainf;
appalling Ainf;
apropos Ainf;
archducal Ainf;
arid Ainf;
articular Ainf;
aspectual Ainf;
assumptive Ainf;
asynchronous Ainf;
attributable Ainf;
auspicious Ainf;
autosomal Ainf;
awned Ainf;
backhanded Ainf;
bally Ainf;
baritone Ainf;
batty Ainf;
bedraggled Ainf;
berberidaceous Ainf;
biennial Ainf;
bimillenary Ainf;
biotechnological Ainf;
bitchy Ainf;
blastomeric Ainf;
bloody-minded Ainf;
bold Ainf;
bosomy Ainf;
brachypterous Ainf;
breakneck Ainf;
bronchial Ainf;
buckskin Ainf;
burghal Ainf;
cachectic Ainf;
caller Ainf;
cannabic Ainf;
caprine Ainf;
carnassial Ainf;
catacaustic Ainf;
causational Ainf;
central Ainf;
cerebrovascular Ainf;
chameleonic Ainf;
chasseur Ainf;
chemospheric Ainf;
chintzy Ainf;
choosey Ainf;
chubby Ainf;
circumambient Ainf;
citizenly Ainf;
clattery Ainf;
climbable Ainf;
cloudless Ainf;
coastal Ainf;
coeternal Ainf;
collenchymatous Ainf;
combinable Ainf;
commissioned Ainf;
compensable Ainf;
compunctious Ainf;
concomitant Ainf;
conferrable Ainf;
congestive Ainf;
connective Ainf;
consonantal Ainf;
contemnible Ainf;
contradictory Ainf;
conversational Ainf;
coprophilous Ainf;
corny Ainf;
cosignatory Ainf;
couth Ainf;
cranial Ainf;
creepy Ainf;
critical Ainf;
crummy Ainf;
cubistic Ainf;
cupric Ainf;
cut Ainf;
cyprinodont Ainf;
damned Ainf;
day-long Ainf;
deceitful Ainf;
decreeable Ainf;
deferential Ainf;
delegable Ainf;
demonic Ainf;
dentoid Ainf;
derivational Ainf;
desperate Ainf;
deviant Ainf;
diageotropic Ainf;
diastrophic Ainf;
different Ainf;
diluent Ainf;
diploblastic Ainf;
discalced Ainf;
disepalous Ainf;
dispensational Ainf;
dissertational Ainf;
distortional Ainf;
diverticular Ainf;
dogleg Ainf;
dotal Ainf;
downhill Ainf;
dreamy Ainf;
ducky Ainf;
dutiful Ainf;
earthbound Ainf;
echolalic Ainf;
edictal Ainf;
effulgent Ainf;
electrical Ainf;
elephantoid Ainf;
embryogenic Ainf;
enarthrodial Ainf;
endoplasmic Ainf;
enphytotic Ainf;
epencephalic Ainf;
epiphytotic Ainf;
equiponderant Ainf;
erumpent Ainf;
ethereal Ainf;
evangelical Ainf;
exaggerated Ainf;
excommunicable Ainf;
exiguous Ainf;
expediential Ainf;
expressive Ainf;
extrajudicial Ainf;
faceless Ainf;
faithless Ainf;
farinose Ainf;
faultless Ainf;
federate Ainf;
ferric Ainf;
fibular Ainf;
fillagree Ainf;
firm Ainf;
flagelliform Ainf;
fledgy Ainf;
floral Ainf;
flyable Ainf;
foodless Ainf;
forehanded Ainf;
formulary Ainf;
fountained Ainf;
fraught Ainf;
frigging Ainf;
frugal Ainf;
fully-fashioned Ainf;
funicular Ainf;
futureless Ainf;
galvanoscopic Ainf;
gaseous Ainf;
gelatinoid Ainf;
geochemical Ainf;
gerontocratic Ainf;
girt Ainf;
glochidiate Ainf;
glyptic Ainf;
good-for-naught Ainf;
gradational Ainf;
graphitic Ainf;
gregarine Ainf;
gruff Ainf;
gushy Ainf;
haematoid Ainf;
halfway Ainf;
handlike Ainf;
harelike Ainf;
hawser-laid Ainf;
hearty Ainf;
hegemonic Ainf;
hemimorphic Ainf;
heretofore Ainf;
heteropolar Ainf;
hierodulic Ainf;
hirundine Ainf;
holier-than-thou Ainf;
homochromous Ainf;
hoofed Ainf;
horsy Ainf;
humeral Ainf;
hybrid Ainf;
hydroxylic Ainf;
hypersensitive Ainf;
hypoplastic Ainf;
iconolatrous Ainf;
ignominious Ainf;
illustratable Ainf;
immiscible Ainf;
impennate Ainf;
implied Ainf;
improvisational Ainf;
inapprehensive Ainf;
incipient Ainf;
incomputable Ainf;
increasable Ainf;
indehiscent Ainf;
indiscernible Ainf;
industrious Ainf;
inexistent Ainf;
inferible Ainf;
infrequent Ainf;
iniquitous Ainf;
inofficious Ainf;
inserted Ainf;
instructional Ainf;
intelligible Ainf;
interferential Ainf;
interposable Ainf;
intoxicable Ainf;
intuitable Ainf;
invincible Ainf;
irksome Ainf;
irrepressible Ainf;
isodynamic Ainf;
isthmian Ainf;
jejunal Ainf;
jowly Ainf;
jurisdictional Ainf;
keramic Ainf;
kittenish Ainf;
labial Ainf;
ladylike Ainf;
laniary Ainf;
lateenrigged Ainf;
lazar-like Ainf;
legationary Ainf;
lentic Ainf;
liberalist Ainf;
light-minded Ainf;
limnetic Ainf;
lithesome Ainf;
lochial Ainf;
longing Ainf;
loveless Ainf;
lukewarm Ainf;
lymphoblastic Ainf;
macromolecular Ainf;
magnetostrictive Ainf;
male Ainf;
managerial Ainf;
manubrial Ainf;
martinetish Ainf;
matron-like Ainf;
meaningful Ainf;
megalithic Ainf;
memorial Ainf;
meridional Ainf;
metachromatic Ainf;
meuniere Ainf;
midnightly Ainf;
miminy-piminy Ainf;
minutely Ainf;
miticidal Ainf;
molten Ainf;
monitorial Ainf;
monomial Ainf;
monumental Ainf;
moth-proof Ainf;
mucinous Ainf;
multiple Ainf;
musky Ainf;
myocardial Ainf;
naked Ainf;
naughty Ainf;
neglectful Ainf;
nethe Ainf;
newish Ainf;
nimblewitted Ainf;
noetic Ainf;
noneffective Ainf;
nonunion Ainf;
notal Ainf;
null Ainf;
nyctitropic Ainf;
obligatory Ainf;
obvious Ainf;
odd Ainf;
officiary Ainf;
oligochaete Ainf;
onerous Ainf;
open-reel Ainf;
optical Ainf;
orient Ainf;
oscitant Ainf;
otolithic Ainf;
oval Ainf;
over-proud Ainf;
overt Ainf;
paganistic Ainf;
palpate Ainf;
papillomatous Ainf;
parasynaptic Ainf;
parsable Ainf;
pastel Ainf;
pavid Ainf;
pediform Ainf;
pennaceous Ainf;
percolable Ainf;
peridotitic Ainf;
peritonitic Ainf;
pert Ainf;
pettish Ainf;
phlebitic Ainf;
photoluminescent Ainf;
phthisic Ainf;
picky Ainf;
pinchbeck Ainf;
pitiable Ainf;
plastered Ainf;
plenipotentiary Ainf;
pluralist Ainf;
polemic Ainf;
polygynous Ainf;
polyzoic Ainf;
portable Ainf;
postimpressionist Ainf;
practical Ainf;
precipitative Ainf;
prefrontal Ainf;
prepositive Ainf;
presumable Ainf;
primitivistic Ainf;
proctorial Ainf;
projective Ainf;
propertied Ainf;
prostyle Ainf;
proventricular Ainf;
psycho-analytical Ainf;
puberulent Ainf;
puncturable Ainf;
pussy Ainf;
pyrotechnic Ainf;
qualitative Ainf;
quick-eared Ainf;
quotidian Ainf;
radioscopic Ainf;
rangy Ainf;
raucous Ainf;
rebarbative Ainf;
recondite Ainf;
redoubtable Ainf;
refreshing Ainf;
reguline Ainf;
remediable Ainf;
rentable Ainf;
repressible Ainf;
resentful Ainf;
resplendent Ainf;
reticuloendothelial Ainf;
revelational Ainf;
rewirable Ainf;
rhyolitic Ainf;
rim-fire Ainf;
rocky Ainf;
rotary Ainf;
rubidic Ainf;
runcinate Ainf;
sacerdotal Ainf;
salicaceous Ainf;
same Ainf;
saucy Ainf;
schlieric Ainf;
scrimp Ainf;
secretarial Ainf;
self-pronouncing Ainf;
sensationalistic Ainf;
setal Ainf;
shelly Ainf;
sickening Ainf;
singular Ainf;
slaphappy Ainf;
smaragdine Ainf;
snowbound Ainf;
solvable Ainf;
southernmost Ainf;
spermatogenetic Ainf;
splendid Ainf;
squeezable Ainf;
statist Ainf;
stichomythic Ainf;
storm-tossed Ainf;
strobic Ainf;
subcontinental Ainf;
subsolar Ainf;
sugared Ainf;
superficial Ainf;
sure Ainf;
swept-back Ainf;
synovitic Ainf;
tangerine Ainf;
tectonic Ainf;
tensionless Ainf;
tetrabasic Ainf;
thermolabile Ainf;
three-storey Ainf;
timorous Ainf;
tonsillitic Ainf;
tow-haired Ainf;
transformative Ainf;
treeless Ainf;
trigonal Ainf;
tropophytic Ainf;
turnable Ainf;
ultramontane Ainf;
unbeatable Ainf;
unconscious Ainf;
undesigning Ainf;
unfortunate Ainf;
unisonous Ainf;
unperforated Ainf;
unscratched Ainf;
untutored Ainf;
uranylic Ainf;
valgus Ainf;
vegetative Ainf;
vernal Ainf;
vigesimal Ainf;
visual Ainf;
voodoo Ainf;
warmish Ainf;
webbed Ainf;
wheaten Ainf;
winning Ainf;
workaday Ainf;
xyloid Ainf;
zygophyllaceous Ainf;
